Washington statutes.
RCW 18.25.075

Inactive status.

(1) An individual may place his or her license on inactive status. The holder of an inactive license shall not practice chiropractic in this state without first activating the license.

(2) The inactive renewal fee shall be established by the secretary pursuant to RCW 43.70.250. Failure to renew an inactive license shall result in cancellation in the same manner as an active license.

(3) An inactive license may be placed in an active status upon compliance with the rules established by the commission.

(4) The provisions relating to the denial, suspension, and revocation of a license shall be applicable to an inactive license, except that when proceedings to suspend or revoke an inactive license have been initiated, the license shall remain inactive until the proceedings have been completed.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 115; 1991 c 3 s 41; 1989 c 258 s 14.]